Massachusetts, session 194th, S849.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the following terms shall
have the following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
“Single payer benchmark”, the estimated total costs of providing health care to all
residents of the commonwealth under a single payer health care system in a given year.
“Single payer health care”, a system that provides publicly financed, universal access to
health care for the population through a unified public health care plan.
(b) The center for health information and analysis shall recommend a methodology to
develop a single payer benchmark. The single payer health care system considered under the
single payer benchmark shall offer continuous, comprehensive and affordable coverage for all
residents of the commonwealth regardless of income, assets, health status or availability of other
health coverage. The benchmark may consider the costs of a single-payer health care system at
different actuarial values, levels of cost-sharing and levels of provider reimbursement; provided
of 2

however that the benchmark shall include all actuarial values, levels of cost-sharing and levels of
provider reimbursement considered by the center. In developing the methodology, the center
shall monitor, review and evaluate reports related to single payer health care and the
performance of single payer health care systems in other states and countries.
(c) The center for health information and analysis, in conjunction with the health policy
commission and the division of insurance, shall provide an annual report detailing a comparison
of the actual health care expenditures in the commonwealth for 2025, 2026 and 2027 with the
single payer benchmark for 2025, 2026 and 2027, respectively, indicating whether the
commonwealth would have saved money while expanding access to care under a single payer
health care system. The first report shall be filed by not later than July 1, 2027 to the clerks of the
senate and house of representatives, the joint committee on health care financing and the senate
and house committees on ways and means.
(d) If a report under subsection (c) determines that the single payer benchmark
outperformed the actual total health care expenditures in the commonwealth in 2025, 2026 and
2027 the health policy commission shall submit a proposed single payer health care
implementation plan to the clerks of the senate and house of representatives, the joint committee
on health care financing and the senate and house committees on ways and means within 1 year
of the date that the report is filed. The plan may include proposed legislation to implement a
single payer health care system that offers continuous, comprehensive and affordable coverage
for all residents regardless of income, assets, health status or availability of other health
coverage. When developing the implementation plan, the commission shall hold not less than 3
public hearings and seek stakeholder input from across the commonwealth.”.
of 2